Washington statutes.
RCW 29A.04.210

Registration required—Exception.

Except for service and overseas voters, only persons registered to vote shall be permitted to vote:

(1) At any election held for the purpose of electing persons to public office;

(2) At any recall election of a public officer;

(3) At any election held for the submission of a measure to any voting constituency;

(4) At any primary election.

This section does not apply to elections where being registered to vote is not a prerequisite to voting.

[ 2009 c 369 s 4; 2003 c 111 s 133; 1965 c 9 s 29.04.010. Prior: 1955 c 181 s 8; prior: (i) 1933 c 1 s 22, part; RRS s 5114-22, part. (ii) 1933 c 1 s 23; RRS s 5114-23. See also 1935 c 26 s 3; RRS s 5189. Formerly RCW 29.04.010.]

NOTES:

Overseas, service voters, same ballots as registered voters: RCW 29A.40.010.